Arkansas, session 2025, SB422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103(2), concerning the definition of
"account owner" under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan, is amended to
read as follows:
(2) “Account owner” means the person who or nonprofit that, under this
chapter or the rules promulgated by the Section 529 Plan Review Committee, is
entitled to select or change the designated beneficiary of an account, to
designate any person other than the designated beneficiary to whom funds may
be paid from the account, or to receive distributions from the account if no
other person is designated;
*CRH018*
03/11/2025 8:43:45 AM CRH018

SB422

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103(7), concerning the definition of
"contributor" under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan, is amended to
read as follows:
(7) “Contributor” means any person making a contribution to an
account or a nonprofit organization making a contribution under § 6-84-
107(a)(1);

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103, concerning the definitions used
in the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(18) "Nonprofit organization" means a charitable organization
exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-84-107(a)(1), concerning the
establishment of an Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Account, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) An account owner or contributor may establish an account by
making an initial contribution to the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan,
signing an application form approved by the Section 529 Plan Review Committee
and naming the account owner and the designated beneficiary.
(B)(i)(a) A contributor that is a nonprofit organization
may establish an account for a designated beneficiary or an identifiable
group of beneficiaries.
(b) A nonprofit organization establishing an
account for a designated beneficiary under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a) of
this section shall present the parent or guardian of the designated
beneficiary an option to voluntarily decline the account and any
contribution.
(ii) The Treasurer of State shall establish a system
or procedure to:
(a) Obtain the personally-identifiable
information necessary to establish an account under this chapter, including
without limitation the Social Security number and date of birth of each
designated beneficiary or account owner necessary for the establishment of an
account; and
03/11/2025 8:43:45 AM CRH018

SB422
(b) Protect the confidentiality of both the
personally-identifiable information and applicable account details.


































03/11/2025 8:43:45 AM CRH018